Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 1

Incorporation

7-81-101. Petition for election.

In any community where there are as many as twenty (20) residences within one square mile (1 sq. mi.), whether the parties owning the residences reside in the community during the whole year or not, any ten (10) of the registered voters may file with the county election commission of the county in which the square mile, or the greater part of the square mile lies, a petition in substance as follows:

“To the county election commission of county:We, the undersigned registered voters, desire that a square mile (or such other quantity as may be desired) be incorporated by the name of (here insert name of town). The incorporated territory lies in civil district No. , county of , and is bounded as follows: (here insert boundaries of territory). We therefore pray that you hold an election to determine whether the territory shall be incorporated.”

The petition shall be sworn to by some one (1) of the signers, who shall state under oath that such person is acquainted with the other signers, and that they are registered voters within the territory to be incorporated.

Acts 1901, ch. 64, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 2023a17, 2023a18; Code 1932, §§ 3648, 3649; modified; Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 4(39); impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2501.

7-81-102. “Registered voters” defined.

“Registered voters” in this chapter means registered voters who are residents of the territory that is proposed for or has been incorporated.

Acts 1901, ch. 64, § 12; Shan., § 2023a28; Code 1932, § 3659; modified; Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 4(40); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2502.

7-81-103. Notice of election.

In addition to all other election notices required by law, the county election commission shall post in three (3) conspicuous places in the proposed sanitary district, five (5) days before the election, a notice substantially in the following language:

NOTICE

State of Tennessee

County of

On the day of , 20 , between the hours of and , .m., the county election commission will hold an election to determine whether the following territory: (here set out the boundaries as in the petition), shall be incorporated. All registered voters who are residents of the territory may vote in the election.

Chair

Chair

Acts 1901, ch. 64, § 3; Shan., § 2023a19; Code 1932, § 3650; modified; Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 4(41); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2503.

7-81-104. Certification of result.

The county election commission shall determine and declare the results of the election and shall certify the results within forty-eight (48) hours after the commission completes its duties under §2-8-105(3). The county election commission shall file the certificate with the county clerk.

Acts 1901, ch. 64, § 7; Shan., § 2023a23; Code 1932, § 3654; modified; Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 4(42); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2507.

7-81-105. Certification of majority for incorporation.

If the number of votes cast in favor of incorporation equals the majority of persons entitled to vote in the election, the county election commission shall immediately forward a certified copy of the certificate to the secretary of state.

Acts 1901, ch. 64, § 8; Shan., § 2023a24; Code 1932, § 3655; modified; Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 4(43); impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2508.

7-81-106. Duties of secretary of state — Charter of incorporation.

Upon receipt of the certified copy of the certificate by the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall copy it in a well-bound book and index the certified copy of the certificate. The secretary of state shall then return the certificate to the register of the county with a certificate that it has been copied in the proper book in such secretary of state's office, and shall issue a certificate of incorporation as follows:

STATE OF TENNESSEE—CHARTER OF INCORPORATIONBe it known, That the town of (here insert name and boundaries of town) is duly and legally incorporated, and is entitled to all the benefits of title 7, chapter 81 of the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 1901, ch. 64, § 9; Shan., § 2023a25; Code 1932, § 3656; Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 4(44); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2509.

7-81-107. Registration of election report and charter — Fees.

The register shall copy the certificate, together with the certificate of the secretary of state, in the charter book in such register's office, which shall complete the incorporation.

The register shall be entitled to the regular recording fees received for recording corporate charters for services performed as directed in this part.

Acts 1901, ch. 64, § 10; Shan., § 2023a26; Code 1932, § 3657; Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 4(45); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2510; Acts 1987, ch. 47, § 1.

7-81-108. Fees of public officers.

The fees of the sheriff shall be two dollars ($2.00), of the county clerk one dollar ($1.00) each, and the secretary of state two dollars ($2.00) for the services directed to be performed in this part.

Acts 1901, ch. 64, § 11; Shan., § 2023a27; Code 1932, § 3658; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2511; Acts 1987, ch. 47, § 2.

Cross-References. Charter fee, secretary of state, §8-21-201.

County clerk's fee, §8-21-701.

Register's fees, §8-21-1001.

7-81-109. Incorporation — Designation as sanitary districts.

Upon the registration of the certificate, the petitioners and their successors and all other voters of the town shall be incorporated and be vested with the right conferred by this chapter, and none other, it being the intention not to confer upon the corporation the powers of incorporated towns in this state.

The corporations organized under this chapter shall be known as “Sanitary Districts.”

Acts 1901, ch. 64, § 13; Shan., § 2023a29; Code 1932, § 3660; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2512.

7-81-110. General municipal laws preserved.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to alter, repeal, or amend the general laws for organizing municipal corporations or taxing districts in this state.

Acts 1901, ch. 64, § 27; Shan., § 2023a52; Code 1932, § 3683; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2533.